Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.30
Use tax; general exemptions.

The use tax imposed in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall not apply to:

(1) The use in this state of materials and replacement parts which are acquired outside this state and which are moved into this state for use directly in the repair, installation, or application and maintenance or manufacture of motor vehicles, watercraft, railroad rolling stock, whether owned by a railroad or by any person, whether a common or contract carrier or otherwise, or aircraft engaged as common or contract carriers; and

(2) The storage, use, or consumption of property which is acquired outside this state, the sale, lease, or rental or the storage, use, or consumption of which property and any associated labor would be exempt from the sales or use tax were it purchased within this state.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 53;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 49;

Laws 1994, LB 977, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1085, § 15.